Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Members, Officers, and Employees

6.145.
Resignation of member.

A member of the General Assembly who desires to resign his office shall submit a letter of resignation to the officer required to issue a writ of special election to fill such vacancy, pursuant to KRS

118.730

. Upon receiving such letter of resignation such officer immediately shall notify the director of the Legislative Research Commission of the fact of such resignation and its effective date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 356, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

6.150.
Officers and employees — Number elected.

At the beginning of each regular session of the General Assembly, each house shall elect one (1) chief clerk, one (1) assistant clerk, one (1) enrolling clerk, one (1) sergeant-at-arms, one (1) doorkeeper and one (1) janitor; the Senate shall elect one (1) cloakroom keeper and three (3) pages and the House of Representatives shall elect two (2) cloakroom keepers and four (4) pages.

History.

1988.

6.160.
Duties of chief clerk, assistant clerk and enrolling clerk of each house.

The chief clerk of each house shall file and preserve in the office of his house a correct copy of the journal of its proceedings. At the close of each session of the General Assembly, he shall make an inventory of all the books, stationery and furniture belonging to his house, box up all the books, and deliver the books, stationery and furniture to the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission and take a receipt for them.

The chief clerk and assistant clerk of each house shall keep an accurate journal of each day’s proceedings; do all necessary engrossing of bills; and read and compare enrolled bills.

The enrolling clerk shall promptly and accurately enroll all bills delivered to him for that purpose which originated in the house of which he is enrolling clerk.

Either house may prescribe additional duties for the chief clerk, assistant clerk or enrolling clerk.

History.

1986, 1989, 1989a-1, 1989a-2, 2437: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 4; 1984, ch. 111, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

6.161.
Journals.

The chief clerk of each house shall furnish a correct journal of its proceedings for each day to the Legislative Research Commission as soon as the journal is approved by the house. The Legislative Research Commission shall carefully compare or have compared the proofs of the journals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 1; 1984, ch. 111, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

6.162.
Expenses of preparing journals — How paid.

The expenses of preparing, indexing, and editing the journals of the General Assembly shall be paid from the appropriation for legislative journals and acts upon requisition of the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 3; 1984, ch. 111, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

6.170.
Duties of sergeant-at-arms, doorkeeper, janitor, cloakroom keeper and pages.

The sergeant-at-arms shall direct and superintend the pages and the delivery of the mail, and perform the duties of the doorkeeper in his absence.

The doorkeeper shall superintend and direct the janitor, and perform the duties of the sergeant-at-arms in his absence.

The janitor of each house shall keep its chamber swept and in order, provide water for drinking purposes, and perform the duties of the cloakroom keeper in his absence.

The cloakroom keeper shall take charge of and keep until called for the coats, hats, umbrellas, canes and other articles placed in his charge by members or employees, and shall be liable to the owner for any loss caused by his negligence.

The pages shall obey the directions of the sergeant-at-arms, and, during his absence, the directions of the doorkeeper.

Either house may prescribe additional duties for any of its officers or employees mentioned in this section.

History.

1989.

6.180.
Employees to attend sessions.

Each employee of the General Assembly shall attend the daily sessions of the house by which he is employed and shall not be absent from the seat of government during the session of the General Assembly without a leave of absence.

History.

1990.

6.185.
Funds appropriated for legislative sessions — Payment of compensation of members and employees.

All funds appropriated for legislative sessions shall be placed in a legislative session fund. All compensation of members and employees and all contingent expenses of the General Assembly shall be paid from this fund on vouchers approved by the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 2; 1984, ch. 111, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

6.190.
Compensation — Travel expenses.

Beginning as of January 1, 1984, the members of the General Assembly, other than the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the majority and minority leadership of each house of the General Assembly, shall each receive as compensation one hundred dollars ($100) per day, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each receive as compensation one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per day, the majority and minority floor leaders of each house of the General Assembly shall each receive as compensation one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per day, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker Pro Tempore, and the majority and minority caucus chairmen and whips of each house of the General Assembly shall each receive as compensation one hundred fifteen dollars ($115) per day, during the session of the General Assembly. In addition to his compensation as a member of the General Assembly, each chairman of a standing committee of the House of Representatives or the Senate shall receive compensation of ten dollars ($10) for each regularly scheduled meeting of the standing committee which he chairs during sessions of the General Assembly. Beginning as of July 1, 1980, each member of the General Assembly shall receive mileage and reimbursement of road tolls for one (1) round trip for each week of the session between his home and the State Capitol during regular sessions and extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly and the necessary travel in going to and returning from the sessions of their respective houses. The mileage allowance under this section shall be equal to the maximum mileage allowance permitted by the federal government, to be increased as federal mileage allowance is increased.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 123, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 3; 1976, ch. 83, § 8, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 437, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 407, § 5, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 331, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 486, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Compiler's Notes.

Former KRS

6.190

(2005-1, 2005-2: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 56, § 1) was repealed by Acts 1950, ch. 123, § 29.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 1, (1) at 1764.

6.191.
Payments in monthly installments from July 1, 1976 through December 31, 1977. [Repealed.]

6.193.
Biennial income to be paid on monthly basis. [Repealed.]

6.200.
Compensation of President of Senate and Speaker of House. [Repealed.]

6.210.
Certification for payment of compensation and travel allowance of members of General Assembly.

The compensation and travel allowance of the President of the Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and members of both houses of the General Assembly shall be paid on the certificate of the co-chairmen of the Legislative Research Commission of the amount due.

History.

342: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 5; 1984, ch. 111, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 486, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

6.211.
Additional allowances for members of General Assembly.

Effective January 1, 1994, in addition to any and all sums, compensation, or expenses now paid the members of the General Assembly, each shall receive an expense allowance of one hundred ten percent (110%) of the expense allowance paid federal employees traveling in the Frankfort, Kentucky area for each calendar day. This sum shall be paid whether the General Assembly is in regular or extraordinary session and shall be in full recompense of any additional expenses incurred in excess of that now received by them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 85, § 1; 1960, ch. 21; 1976, ch. 83, § 9, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 437, § 2, effective March 31, 1978; 1994, ch. 1, § 1, effective February 11, 1994; 1994, ch. 486, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). The 1994 amendment of this statute, effective February 11, 1994, was retroactive to January 1, 1994. See 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 1 and 486 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

6.212.
Payment of allowances authorized by KRS 6.211.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, on the first and fifteenth day of each month, during the time the General Assembly is in regular or extraordinary session, draw his warrant on the Treasurer in favor of each member of the General Assembly for the sums set forth in KRS

6.211

. These sums shall be paid from the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 85, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1994, ch. 486, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

6.213.
Interim expense allowances for members.

In addition to the per diem and all allowances provided by law to members of the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, each member of the Legislature is hereby granted an expense allowance of nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) per month for secretarial assistance, books and periodicals, other reports or publications, conduct of small-scale studies related to governmental activity, postage, telephone service, or any other expense incident to performance of the legislator’s duties.

The expense allowance provided for herein shall not be payable during any session of the General Assembly. For sessions occurring during a part of the month, the expense allowance shall be prorated.

Such expense allowances shall be paid by the State Treasury out of the general fund of the Commonwealth upon warrant of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, issued on the certification of the director of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 31, §§ 1 to 3; 1968, ch. 197, § 5; 1972, ch. 336, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1976, ch. 83, § 10, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 437, § 3, effective March 31, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 16, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 1, (1) at 1764.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Giving American flags to constituents, providing emergency crisis assistance to constituents, and purchasing park equipment for district parks are not expenses “incident to performance of the legislator’s duties,” within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section.

OAG 78-611

.

6.220.
Allowance in lieu of stationery.

In lieu of stationery, there shall be allowed to each member of the General Assembly the sum of fifty dollars ($50). This allowance shall be paid out of the State Treasury at the beginning of the session.

History.

371: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 56, § 3; 1994, ch. 486, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. III, 7, at 1765.

6.225.
Offices for President of Senate and Speaker of House of Representatives — Interim per diem and expenses.

Between sessions of the General Assembly offices shall be maintained in the State Capitol building for the use and benefit of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Except when the General Assembly is in session the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each receive an amount per day equal to the per diem compensation they receive during sessions of the General Assembly for each day they are engaged in the duties of their offices and shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 238, § 1; 1974, ch. 353, § 2; 1982, ch. 129, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 486, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

6.226.
Legislative Compensation Commission — Membership. [Repealed.]

6.227.
Terms — Chairman — Expenses. [Repealed.]

6.228.
Duties. [Repealed.]

6.229.
Legislative budget to include recommendations of commission. [Repealed.]

6.230.
Compensation of employees.

Employees of the General Assembly shall receive a per diem as follows: chief clerk, one hundred twenty dollars ($120); assistant clerk, one hundred ten dollars ($110); enrolling clerk, one hundred five dollars ($105); sergeant-at-arms, eighty-five dollars ($85); doorkeeper, eighty-five dollars ($85); janitors, seventy-five dollars ($75); cloakroom keeper, seventy-five dollars ($75); pages, thirty-five dollars ($35) each.

History.

1989a-1, 1989a-2, 1989a-3, 1991; Acts 1956, ch. 1, § 6; 1968, ch. 215; 1976, ch. 47, § 1, effective March 9, 1976; 1978, ch. 9, § 1, effective February 13, 1978; 1980, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 63, § 1, effective March 9, 1982; 1986, ch. 115, § 1, effective March 21, 1986; 1994, (1st. Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1, effective June 22, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 252, Part XII, § 1, effective April 25, 2006.

6.235.
Compensation of Chief Clerks for duties concerning journals. [Repealed.]

6.237.
Group life and group hospitalization insurance for members of General Assembly.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the recommendation of the director of the Legislative Research Commission shall procure from one (1) or more life insurance companies, and from one (1) or more hospitalization insurance companies, authorized to do business in this state, a policy or policies of group life insurance insuring the lives of all members of the General Assembly and shall procure a policy or policies of group hospitalization insurance covering all members of the General Assembly. The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of the Department of Insurance and may contain such provisions as he approves whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.

The premiums shall be paid by the state for individual policies for members of the General Assembly. The premiums for family policies shall be paid by funds contributed partly from the policyholder and partly from the state.

No payment of premium by the state shall constitute compensation to an insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the compensation of such an employee; any premium or other expense incurred by the state shall be considered a proper cost of administration.

The policy or policies may also provide accidental death and dismemberment insurance and may contain such provisions with respect to the amounts of insurance for members of the General Assembly, terms of eligibility, continuation of insurance after retirement, and such other provisions as the commissioner of the Department of Insurance may approve.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to perform all acts necessary or advisable for the purpose of contracting for and maintaining insurance under the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 112, § 1; 2010, ch. 24, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.